North Carolina statutes. Chapter 1B. Contribution.
Article 3. Cross Claims and Joinder of Third Parties for Contribution. [Repealed]

§ 1B-8.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1969, c. 895, s. 19.

Cross References.

For provisions of Rules of Civil Procedure as to crossclaims, see

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 13.

For provisions similar to those of subsection (b) of repealed

G.S. 1B-8

, see

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 14.